Utah statutes.
16-6a-607.   Creditor's action against member.

A proceeding may not be brought by a creditor to reach the liability, if any, of a member to the nonprofit corporation unless:

(1) (a)  final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor against the nonprofit corporation; and

(b)  execution has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part; or

(2)  a proceeding described in Subsection (1) would be useless.

